Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-122
Governor; succession to office; oath of office; effect.

The taking of the oath of office by an individual specified in section 84-120, except the Lieutenant Governor, shall be held to constitute his resignation from the office by virtue of the holding of which he qualifies to act as Governor.

Laws 1959, c. 449, § 3, p. 1500.